California, session 20252026, AB2125.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 836 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:836. (a) When the plaintiff files the complaint, the plaintiff shall also lodge with the court both of the following:(1) (A) A draft notice titled “NOTICE OF COMMENCEMENT OF GROUNDWATER BASIN ADJUDICATION” in no less than 20-point font and the following text printed immediately below the draft notice title in no less than 14-point font:“THIS NOTICE IS IMPORTANT. ANY RIGHTS YOU CLAIM TO PUMP OR STORE GROUNDWATER FROM THE BASIN IDENTIFIED IN THIS NOTICE MAY BE AFFECTED BY A LAWSUIT INITIATED BY THE COMPLAINT SUMMARIZED BELOW.A copy of the complaint may be obtained by contacting the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney identified in this notice. If you claim rights to pump or store groundwater within the basin, either now or in the future, you may become a party to this lawsuit by filing an answer to the lawsuit on or before the deadline specified in this notice. You may file an answer by completing the attached form answer, filing it with the court indicated in this notice, and sending a copy of the form answer to the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney.Failing to participate in this lawsuit could have a significant adverse effect on any right to pump or store groundwater that you may have. You may seek the advice of an attorney in relation to this lawsuit. Such attorney should be consulted promptly. A case management conference in this groundwater basin adjudication proceeding shall occur on the date specified in this notice. If you intend to participate in the groundwater adjudication proceeding to which this notice applies, you are advised to attend the initial case management conference in person or have an attorney represent you at the initial case management conference.Participation requires the production of all information regarding your groundwater use. You must provide this information by the date identified in this notice.A form answer is provided for your convenience. You may fill out the form answer and file it with the court. Should you choose to file the form answer, it will serve as an answer to all complaints and cross-complaints filed in this case.”(B) The following information shall be provided immediately following the text described in subparagraph (A):(i) The name of the basin that is the subject of the comprehensive adjudication and a link to the internet website address where the department has posted a map of the basin.(ii) A space to be completed with the case number assigned to the comprehensive adjudication, and the name and address of the court and department to which the action is assigned.(iii) The name, address, telephone number, and email address of the plaintiff, or plaintiff’s attorney, from whom the complaint may be obtained and to whom a copy of the form answer should be sent.(iv) A summary of the causes of action alleged in the complaint and the relief sought. The summary shall not exceed 25 lines.(v) A date by which persons receiving the notice must appear in the comprehensive adjudication.(2) (A) A draft form answer titled “ANSWER TO ADJUDICATION COMPLAINT” in no less than 20-point font and the following text printed immediately below the draft form answer title in no less than 14-point font:“The undersigned denies all material allegations in the complaint or cross-complaint in this action that seeks to adjudicate rights in the groundwater basin and asserts all applicable affirmative defenses to that complaint.”(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the filing of an answer in the form described in subparagraph (A) in a comprehensive adjudication is sufficient to put at issue all material allegations and applicable affirmative defenses to the complaint in the comprehensive adjudication. If a party intends to seek adjustment of the basin’s boundaries, it shall disclose that intention in the form answer described in subparagraph (A).(b) Within 30 days of the assignment of a judge by the Chairperson of the Judicial Council, the plaintiff shall file a motion for approval of the draft notice and draft form answer filed pursuant to subdivision (a). The plaintiff’s motion shall include a copy of the draft notice and draft form answer filed pursuant to subdivision (a).(c) Once the court approves the draft notice, service of that notice in accordance with this section shall substitute for the summons otherwise provided for in civil actions pursuant to Section 412.20.(d) (1) Following a court order approving the notice and form answer and authorizing service of landowners pursuant to this section, the plaintiff shall do all of the following:(A) Identify the assessor parcel numbers and physical addresses of all real property in the basin and the names and addresses of all holders of fee title to real property in the basin using the records of the assessor or assessors of the county or counties in which the basin to be adjudicated lies. The plaintiff shall provide the court and all parties with notice of its acquisition of, or sufficient access to, this information.(B) Mail, by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, the notice, complaint, and form answer to all holders of fee title to real property in the basin. If the physical address of the real property differs from the address of the holder of fee title, the notice, complaint, and form answer shall be mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the physical address of the real property and the address of the holder of fee title.(C) If return receipt is not received for a parcel of real property, the plaintiff shall post a copy of the notice, complaint, and form answer in a conspicuous place on the real property.(D) Within 20 days of the court order, publish the notice at least once per week for four consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each county overlying the basin in whole or in part.(2) Service pursuant to this subdivision is not required if the real property is owned by a person in a class of water users that are otherwise noticed in accordance with this chapter. If the owner is part of a class of water users proposed for certification, service is not required until the court acts on the proposal for certification.(e) (1) After completing the mailing pursuant to subdivision (d), the plaintiff shall file with the court a notice of the completion of the mailing.(2) If service was made pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the notice of completion of mailing shall include the affidavit of the person who mailed the notice and the certified or registered mail delivery receipt for each parcel						showing stating the date, time, and place of mailing. The delivery receipt shall be signed by the party served or their legally authorized representative. mailing for each parcel. The notice shall include as an attachment any certified or registered mail delivery receipts received as of the date of the filing.(3) If service is made pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the notice of completion of mailing shall include the affidavit of the person who posted the notice specifying the date, time, and physical location of each parcel where the posting occurred, accompanied by a photograph depicting the posted notice.(f) A property owner who has received notice of the comprehensive adjudication and transfers property during the pendency of the comprehensive adjudication shall disclose, on the Real Estate Transfer Disclosure Statement, that the property is subject to a comprehensive adjudication and shall attach the court-approved notice to the Real Estate Transfer Disclosure Statement.(g) Following a court order authorizing service of landowners pursuant to this section, the plaintiff shall serve any known person that pumps groundwater who would not otherwise be served pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section, except those who have been exempted by the court pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 833 or those who are part of a class certified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of this section. Service pursuant to this subdivision shall be by personal delivery or by mail in the manner prescribed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5.(h) Service on the United States shall be made in accordance with Section 666 of Title 43 of the United States Code.(i) The court may authorize any other procedures it finds appropriate and necessary to provide notice to persons who may hold groundwater rights in the basin. basin, including, but not limited to, requiring the plaintiff to utilize restricted delivery of all mailed notices.(j) Compliance with the service and notice provisions of this chapter shall be deemed effective service of process of the complaint and notice on all interested parties of the comprehensive adjudication for purposes of establishing in rem jurisdiction and the comprehensive effect of the comprehensive adjudication.(k) Whenever proceedings are instituted under this chapter, it shall be the duty of all claimants interested in the proceedings and having notice of the proceedings pursuant to this chapter to appear in the proceedings and to submit proof of their claims at the time, and in the manner, required by this chapter.(l) The court may require notice to be made available in languages other than English.(m) Within 15 days of the court order approving the notice and form answer, the plaintiff shall provide the notice and form answer to the department and each county and groundwater sustainability agency that overlies the basin or a portion of the basin. The department, and each county and groundwater sustainability agency that overlies the basin or a portion of the basin and has an internet website shall do all of the following:(1) Within 15 days of receiving the notice and form answer, post those documents on its internet website.(2) Provide a link to the notice and form answer on the home page of its internet website.(3) Maintain the posting and link described in paragraphs (1) and (2) for the entire time the comprehensive adjudication is pending. The plaintiff shall notify the department and each county and groundwater sustainability agency when the comprehensive adjudication is no longer pending.